Utah statutes.
69-2-8.   Liabilities of providers.

(1)  A provider of local exchange service or radio communications service may by tariff or agreement with a customer provide for the customer's release of any claim, suit, or demand against the provider based upon a disclosure or a nondisclosure of an unlisted or nonpublished telephone number and address, and the related address, if a call for any 911 emergency telephone service is made from the customer's telephone.

(2)  A provider of local exchange service, radio communications service, or telephone terminal equipment needed to implement or enhance 911 emergency telephone service, and their employees and agents, are not liable for any damages in a civil action for injuries, death, or loss to person or property incurred as a result of any act or omission of the provider, employee, or agent, in connection with developing, adopting, implementing, maintaining, enhancing, or operating a 911 emergency telephone service, except for damages or injury intentionally caused by or resulting from gross negligence of the provider or person.

